Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 10 State Investment Commission

35-10-1.
Establishment — Membership — Officers — Quorum — Investment votes — Fund managers.

There is hereby authorized, created and established in the office of the general treasurer a state investment commission, the membership of which shall consist of the general treasurer, ex officio, or a deputy general treasurer as his or her designee, who shall act as chairperson, the director of administration, ex officio, or any assistant director of administration as his or her designee, who shall act as secretary, an active or retired teacher, state, or municipal employee member of the retirement system or official from the teacher, state, or municipal employee unions to be appointed by the general treasurer for a term of three (3) years, the executive director of the state retirement board, who shall be a nonvoting member, three (3) members of the general public to be appointed by the general treasurer, one of whom shall serve for an initial term of one year, and one of whom shall serve for an initial term of two (2) years and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified and three (3) members of the general public to be appointed by the governor, one of whom shall serve for an initial term of three (3) years, one of whom shall serve for an initial term of two (2) years, and one of whom shall serve for an initial term of one year and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. Thereafter, the general public members shall serve for three (3) year terms and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. The members of the general public appointed by the governor and the general treasurer shall be qualified by training or experience in the field of investment or finance.

The commission may elect from among its own members such other officers as they deem necessary. All general treasurer and gubernatorial appointments made under this section after the effective date of this act [July 4, 2006] shall be subject to the advice and consent of the senate. No one shall be eligible for appointment unless he or she is a resident of this state.

Public members of the board shall be removable by the chair for cause only, and removal solely for partisan or personal reasons unrelated to capacity or fitness for the office shall be unlawful.

Newly appointed and qualified public members shall, within six (6) months of their appointment, attend a training course that shall be developed and provided by the office of the general treasurer and shall include instruction in the following areas: the provisions of chapter 10 of title 35, chapter 46 of title 42, chapter 14 of title 36 and chapter 2 of title 38 of the Rhode Island general laws; and the board’s rules and regulations. The director of the department of administration shall, within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this act [July 4, 2006], prepare and disseminate training materials relating to the provisions of chapter 46 of title 42, chapter 14 of title 36 and chapter 2 of title 38.

Any member of the general public who was appointed by the governor or general treasurer prior to the effective date of this act [July 4, 2006] shall continue to serve until such time as a successor is appointed and qualified.

A member shall be eligible to succeed himself or herself. In the event of a vacancy in the office of an appointive member, the vacancy shall be filled by the appointing authority for the unexpired term.

A majority of all the members of the commission shall be necessary to constitute a quorum thereof. The approval of a majority of the commission shall be required prior to the purchase or sale of any investment, excepting those investments made by investment managers engaged by the commission and invested in accordance with the commission’s statement of investment objectives and policies, day to day cash investments by the general treasurer, and, because of the importance of speedy action, investments in obligations of the United States government or certificates of deposit maturing within one year. These investments may be made within the framework of a policy established by the commission without prior approval of each transaction. The commission shall be empowered to engage one or more fund managers and to delegate to the manager or managers the authority to carry out the investment of the funds within the commission’s control, or any portion thereof, in accordance with the objectives of the commission as set forth in its statement of investment objectives and policies.

The day-to-day administration of the commission, including the voting of proxies and the execution of investment acquisitions and dispositions of the commission’s assets, shall be carried out by the office of the general treasurer; provided, that the costs and expenses incurred in the management of the funds within the commission’s control shall remain the obligation of those funds and not that of the general treasurer.

Within ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year during which the board has conducted business, the commission shall submit an annual report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the secretary of state of its activities during that fiscal year. The report shall provide: an operating statement summarizing meetings or hearings held, meeting minutes if requested, subjects addressed, decisions rendered, rules or regulations promulgated, studies conducted, policies and plans developed, approved, or modified, and programs administered or initiated; a consolidated financial statement of all the funds received and expended including the source of funds, a listing of any staff supported by these funds, and a summary of any clerical, administrative or technical support received; a summary of performance during the previous fiscal year including accomplishments, shortcomings and remedies; a synopsis of hearings, complaints, suspensions, or other legal matters related to the authority of the board; a summary of any training courses held pursuant to §

35-10-1

; a briefing on anticipated activities in the upcoming fiscal year; and findings and recommendations for improvements. The report shall be posted electronically on the general assembly and the secretary of state’s website as prescribed in §

42-20-8.2

. The director of the department of administration shall be responsible for the enforcement of this provision.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 5, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 88, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 60, art. 1, § 6; P.L. 1990, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 75, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 411, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 432, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 319, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 444, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 14.

35-10-2.
Determination of funds for investment.

The commission shall in its absolute discretion determine which money of the state fund structure are not immediately required for expenditure and shall invest the money of the state from the general fund, rotary funds, sinking funds, special revenue funds, trust and agency funds, including the veterans’ home fund, permanent school fund, employees’ retirement fund, Touro Jewish synagogue fund, Rhode Island temporary disability insurance reserve fund, and from such other funds as are established or which may be established in the custody of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 164, § 2.

35-10-3.
Investment of bond issue proceeds.

The commission shall invest the proceeds of all bond issues not immediately required.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 164, § 3.

35-10-4.
Funds not subject to investment.

The commission shall not invest money in funds which are subject to the control of the council on postsecondary education; provided, however, that the commission shall not be prohibited from investing moneys in the college savings program created by §

16-57-6.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 164, § 4; P.L. 1997, ch. 81, § 3; P.L. 1997, ch. 91, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 14.

35-10-5.
Investment of sinking fund moneys.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, any sinking fund money shall be invested in bonds or certificates of indebtedness of the state, or in bonds of the United States or of any state of the United States, or, in the commission’s discretion, in the interest bearing notes or bonds of any city, town, or fire district in the state, or of any county, city, or town in any state of the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 164, § 5.

35-10-6.
Investment of funds not immediately required.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any money not immediately required shall be invested for the benefit of the several funds in any security or investment in which deposits of savings banks and participation deposits in banks and trust companies may be legally invested; provided, that investments shall be made in securities as would be acquired by prudent persons of discretion and intelligence in these matters, who are seeking a reasonable income and the preservation of their capital.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), the commission is authorized and empowered to execute the disposition and investment of the funds which are within its control in accordance with the prudent person standard as defined in this subsection. The commission shall adopt a statement of investment objectives and policies consistent with the prudent person standard. Management and professional expenses incurred by the commission in the furtherance of this section shall be paid from the funds in an amount required for these expenses. For purposes of this subsection, the prudent person standard shall be that standard of care employed solely in the interest of the participants and beneficiaries of the funds and:

For the exclusive purpose of:

Providing benefits to participants and their beneficiaries; and

Defraying reasonable expenses of administering the funds;

With the care, skill, prudence, and diligence under the circumstances then prevailing that a prudent person acting in a like capacity and familiar with these matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of a like character and with like aims; and

By diversifying the investments of the fund so as to minimize the risk of large losses, unless under the circumstances it is clearly prudent not to do so.

The state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the purchase of investments, upon receipt by him or her of properly authenticated vouchers signed by the chairperson, or a deputy treasurer in the event of the chairperson’s absence or illness, and by the secretary of the commission. The proceeds from the sale of investments shall be paid to the general treasurer for the benefit of the several funds on the forms prescribed and duly signed by the chairperson and secretary of the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 164, § 6; P.L. 1987, ch. 60, art. 1, § 6; P.L. 1987, ch. 557, § 1.

35-10-7.
Expenses of commission — Employees.

Members of the commission shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for any necessary expenses.

No member or employee of the commission shall profit directly or indirectly from any investment transaction made by the commission. This provision is not intended to limit in any way the right of any member or employee of the commission to own shares of stock or bonds of any corporation or other entity in which money of the several funds are or may be invested.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 164, § 7; P.L. 1963, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 9, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 21, § 28; P.L. 2006, ch. 319, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 444, § 3.

35-10-8.
Rules and regulations.

The commission is authorized and empowered to adopt and prescribe rules of procedure and regulations, and from time to time amend, change, and eliminate such rules and regulations as it may deem necessary to the proper administration of this chapter and the performance of its duties, by filing written notice thereof in the office of the secretary of state; and may in any particular case prescribe a variation in the procedure or regulation when it shall deem it necessary, in view of the exigencies of the case and the importance of speedy action, in order to carry out the intent and purpose of this chapter, by filing written notice thereof in the office of the secretary of state. All these filings shall be available for public inspection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 164, § 8.

35-10-9.
Repeal of authority of various officers and boards.

All authority for investment placed with the governor, the general treasurer, the retirement board, the sinking fund commission, the director of employment security, or any other state officer, is herewith repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 164, § 9.

35-10-10.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 171, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 9, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

35-10-11.
Additional investment powers.

The state, any state agency, any city or town, and any municipal agency which has, or has control of, any funds not immediately required for other purposes may, in addition to other investments in which it may be authorized to invest by law, and notwithstanding any provisions of any special law or municipal charter to the contrary, invest these funds, either individually or with each other, in:

Deposits in banks, savings banks, national banks or trust companies, loan and investment companies, credit unions; and in shares of building-loan associations; the principal office of which institution or institutions is located in this state or which has a deposit-taking facility within this state; provided, that the investments shall be made as would be done by prudent persons of discretion and intelligence in these matters who are seeking a reasonable income and preservation of their capital;

Shares or units of beneficial interest of any open end investment company or association or investment trust which is registered under the federal Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80a-1 et seq.; provided, that the company, association, or trust shall:

Limit the issuance, distribution, and ownership of its shares or units solely to this state, state agencies, cities and towns of this state, and municipal agencies thereof, other than shares or units issued in connection with the initial capital required by the federal Investment Company Act of 1940;

Invest solely in securities and investments which are lawful for investments of savings deposits as set forth and defined in chapter 3 of title 19, without regard to the provisions of this chapter as to percentage of deposits which may be so invested, or are lawful for investment of reserve funds by cities and towns under §

45-11-1

, but subject to the restrictions that:

No investment shall be made in any security or investment authorized under chapter 3 of title 19, unless, after giving effect to the investment, no more than ten percent (10%) of the total assets of the company, association, or trust shall be invested in securities or investments of a class or type authorized solely under this chapter;

No investment shall be made in any security or investment authorized under chapter 3 of title 19, unless, after giving effect to the investments, no more than five percent (5%) of the total assets shall be invested in the securities or investments authorized solely under this chapter of any one issuer or obligor; and

If the lawful investments constitute collateral for any repurchase agreement, the company, association, or trust shall take delivery of the collateral either directly or through an authorized custodian; and

Invest solely in such of the investments as would be done by prudent persons of discretion and intelligence in these matters who are seeking a reasonable income and preservation of their capital; and

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (1), (2)(ii)(A), and (2)(ii)(B), in:

Obligations issued or guaranteed by the United States government or any agency or instrumentality thereof and repurchase agreements fully collateralized thereby, or in securities of any open end investment company or association or investment trust, custodial arrangement, or pool which is registered under or exempt from the federal Investment Company Act of 1940, provided, that the portfolio of the company, association, trust, custodial arrangement, or pool is limited to obligations issued or guaranteed by the United States government or any agency or instrumentality thereof and repurchase agreements fully collateralized thereby and that the company, association, trust, custodial arrangement, or pool takes delivery of the collateral either directly or through an authorized custodian, agent, or depository; and

Any security of a state or political subdivision thereof, or in securities of any open end investment company or association or investment trust, custodial arrangement, or pool which is registered under or exempt from the federal Investment Company Act of 1940, provided, that

The portfolio of the company, association, trust, custodial arrangement, or pool is limited to state or political subdivision securities and repurchase agreements fully collateralized thereby;

The company, association, trust, custodial arrangement, or pool takes delivery of the collateral either directly or through an authorized custodian or depository;

The interest on the securities is exempt from federal income taxation;

At the time of the investment, the security (in the case of a security issued by or on behalf of a state or political subdivision thereof) has a rating as determined by a national rating agency of municipal obligations equal or superior to the last rating by the agency applicable to general obligations of the state or (in the case of a fund) the fund invests solely in securities having these ratings;

In connection with the investments, the state, state agency, city, town, or municipal agency may enter into contracts to purchase and resell the investments at specified or determinable prices.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1), in certificates of deposit obtained in accordance with the following conditions:

The funds are initially invested through a financial institution as defined in subdivision

19-1-1(7)

or chapter 19-1, selected by the investing governmental entity;

The selected financial institution arranges for the deposit of the funds in certificates of deposit in one or more federally insured banks or savings and loan associations, for the account of the governmental entity;

The full amount of the principal and accrued interest of each certificate of deposit is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation;

The selected financial institution acts as custodian for the governmental entity with respect to the certificates of deposit issued for the governmental entity’s account; and

At the same time that the governmental entity’s funds are deposited and the certificates of deposit are issued, the selected financial institution receives an amount of deposits from customers of other banks and savings and loan associations, wherever located, equal to the amount of funds initially invested by the governmental entity through the selected financial institution.

Public deposits placed in accordance with the conditions prescribed in this subsection shall not be required to be secured by eligible collateral as set forth in chapter 35-10.1.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 222, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 255, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 154, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 110, § 4; P.L. 1987, ch. 340, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 269, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 105, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 108, § 1.

35-10-12.
Investment in corporations doing business in South Africa.

It is hereby found by the general assembly that:

The African national congress (ANC), led by Nelson Mandela, has called upon the international community to lift all sanctions previously imposed to censure South Africa for its apartheid policies and to apply economic pressure to leverage political and humanitarian change in that country; and

South Africa has held elections in April, 1994, allowing black South Africans their first opportunity to vote in national elections.

Following democratically-held elections in the Republic of South Africa, the commission and all quasi-public agencies shall be free to hold the stocks, bonds, and other forms of financial investments of any banks or publicly-traded corporations which operate in South Africa, hereby lifting the sanctions previously imposed on these investments.

The commission shall encourage, through the voting of proxies with other institutional investors, United States corporations operating in the Republic of South Africa to endorse and comply with the responsible reinvestment standard set forth by the South African council of churches (SACC), known as the “Code of Conduct for Businesses Operating in South Africa”, which is designed to promote equal opportunity, workers’ rights, environmental protection, and community economic development benefitting all South Africans.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 336, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 419, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 138, § 1.

35-10-13.
Reinvestments directed at job retention and creation.

Consistent with the investment criteria set forth in §§

35-10-6

,

35-10-11

, and

35-10-12

, the commission is specifically authorized to invest state funds or pension funds in investments which are intended to retain or create jobs in the New England region, but with priority given among the investments to the retention and creation of jobs in the state of Rhode Island. Notwithstanding the investment limitations set forth in §§

35-10-6

and

35-10-11

, the commission may in any particular case prescribe the following variations in these investment limitations when it shall deem it appropriate in view of the exigencies of the case and in order to carry out the intent and purpose of this section: (1) direct or indirect mortgage or collateral loans for projects or businesses; or (2) direct or equity interests in real estate, projects, or businesses; provided, that the total amount of all these loans or investments do not exceed at the time of making the loan and/or investment five percent (5%) of the total funds which are under the jurisdiction of the commission and which are subject to its statement of investment objectives and guidelines; and further provided, that investments made under this section shall be made in accordance with the prudent person standard set forth in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 336, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 244, § 1.

35-10-14.
Investment in corporations doing business in Northern Ireland.

Notwithstanding any general or special law or regulation to the contrary, the general treasurer, acting as the treasurer/custodian of the state employees’ retirement system and the teachers’ retirement system, and as the chairperson of the state investment commission, is authorized and directed to monitor, by reference to reports of the investor responsibility research center or such other sources as he or she may deem useful and appropriate, the extent to which corporations organized under the laws of the United States or the several states and operating in Northern Ireland, in which the assets of the retirement systems or of the pension reserves investment trust fund are invested, adhere to principals of nondiscrimination in employment and freedom of workplace opportunity. In conducting the survey, the general treasurer may utilize any information presently available relative to similar pension plans. In making this determination, the general treasurer shall consider, without limitation, the following standards for corporate activity:

Equal access to employment, promotion, and job-preservation without regard to religious affiliation or other minority status;

The promotion of religious tolerance within the workplace, and the eradication of any manifestations of religious and other illegal discrimination;

Adherence to other legal and regulatory guidelines for nondiscrimination and equality of opportunity existing in Northern Ireland; and

Adherence to the MacBride Principles for Northern Ireland, so-called.

The general treasurer shall set forth the results of the investigation by filing a report with the clerks of the house of representatives and of the senate not later than December 31 of each year. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the names and addresses of all United States corporations operating in Northern Ireland in which the assets of the retirement systems or trust fund are invested, and the findings of the general treasurer relative to these corporations’ adherence to the standards for corporate activity as set forth in subsection (a). The general treasurer shall also report his or her recommendations, if any, consistent with prudent fiduciary practice, based upon the findings of the investigation. The report shall be available for public inspection in the offices of the clerks of the house of representatives and of the senate, and in the office of the general treasurer.

The general treasurer, subject to the approval of the commission, shall, where necessary, appropriate, and consistent with prudent standards for fiduciary practice, support shareholder petitions or initiatives requiring corporate action in compliance with the standards for nondiscrimination set forth in this section.

It is not the intent of this section to diminish the present portfolio and it is not the intent of this section to injure the fragile economy of Northern Ireland. The general treasurer, in accordance with sound investment criteria, is encouraged to make future pension fund investments in United States firms which conduct business in Northern Ireland and which abide by the MacBride Principles of fair employment. Should all or any of the United States firms in which Rhode Island state pension funds are invested refuse to comply with the MacBride Principles, the general treasurer, in accordance with sound investment criteria, does have the option and is encouraged to remove these funds and invest them in United States firms which conduct business in Northern Ireland and which abide by the MacBride Principles of fair employment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 518, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 513, § 1.

35-10-15.
Disclosure of performance and expenses.

In 2015, the office of general treasurer launched the “Transparent Treasury Initiative” in order to assist the public in accessing information regarding how the state’s pension investments are managed and invested; how such investments are performing; and to provide an overview of the state’s pension investment strategies. The purpose of this section is to provide a statutory requirement for the continuance of several aspects of this initiative.

The state investment commission shall, on a best-effort basis, compile and disclose in a manner readily accessible to the public the following information:

On a quarterly basis, as to each investment vehicle and as to all vehicles in the aggregate, the current values of the investment, and the annualized performance of the investment, net of fees and expenses;

On an annual basis, as to each vehicle and as to all vehicles in the aggregate, the dollar amount of fees and expenses paid to each manager including, if applicable, management fees, performance fees, and fund expenses.

Disclosure of expenses in subsection (b)(2) of this section shall only be required for investments initiated by the retirement system on or after June 30, 2017.

The general treasurer shall use best efforts to calculate and verify the relevant information necessary for the state investment commission to comply with these disclosure requirements.

For purposes of this section:

“Investment” means an investment in a mutual fund, index fund, private equity fund, a venture capital fund, a hedge fund, a real estate fund, infrastructure fund, or any other investment vehicle in which retirement system assets are invested.

“Investment vehicle” means the mutual fund, index fund, limited partnership, limited-liability company or similar legal structure through which the retirement system makes an investment.

“Retirement system” means the employees’ retirement system of the state established by §

36-8-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 427, § 1.